District of Columbia statutes.
50-1612

Bicycle rental information.

(a)

As of June 1, 2008, a person regularly engaged in the business of renting bicycles shall require each person seeking to rent a bicycle to provide his or her signature on the rental form, or on a separate form, containing each of the following:

(1)

A statement of rental bearing the names and addresses of the lessor and lessee;

(2)

The rate at which the bicycle is being rented; and

(3)

The time for which the bicycle is being rented.

(b)

The form used to meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section may be the same form used to meet the requirements of § 50-1605(f).

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-179, § 202
as added May 1, 2008, D.C. Law 17-149, § 2(c), 55 DCR 1272